Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.700.030

Preparatory secondary career and technical education programs—Criteria.

All approved preparatory secondary career and technical education programs must meet the following minimum criteria:

(1) Either:

(a) Lead to a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized by trades, industries, or other professional associations as necessary for employment or advancement in that field; or

(b) Allow students to earn dual credit for high school and college through career and technical education, advanced placement, or other agreements or programs;

(2) Be comprised of a sequenced progression of multiple courses that are technically intensive and rigorous; and

(3) Lead to workforce entry, state or nationally approved apprenticeships, or postsecondary education in a related field.

[ 2022 c 75 s 6; 2008 c 170 s 103; 2006 c 115 s 2. Formerly RCW 28C.04.110.]